Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
REQUIREMENTS AND COMPENSATION OF OFFICERS

31-4-401. Oath or affirmation of officers - bonds - waiver - declaring office vacant.

All officers elected or appointed in any municipality shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

The governing body has the power to declare vacant the office of a person appointed or elected to an office who fails to take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101 when required within ten days after the person has been notified of the person's appointment or election, and the governing body shall proceed to appoint the person's successor as in other cases of vacancy.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1035, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1291, § 11, effective April 6.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 746, § 18, effective April 4.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 699, § 30, effective August 8; (2) amended, (HB 18-1140), ch. 41, p. 465, § 8, effective August 8.

31-4-402. New bond.

In the event that the official bond of any officer of a city or town, after the taking and approval thereof, becomes insufficient by reason of the death or insolvency of any of the sureties thereon, the governing body of such city or town may require such officer to procure additional sureties or to give a new bond and may designate the time when such additional sureties or new bond shall be furnished, which shall not be less than ten days, or may waive the requirement for such sureties or new bond. In the event that the additional sureties or new bond is not furnished within the time so designated and the requirement for such sureties or new bond is not waived, the office shall be declared vacant, and the vacancy shall be filled by election or appointment as provided by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1035, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1292, § 12, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-403. Lawful pay only for governing bodies.

No member of the governing body of any city or town shall receive any compensation for his services as such member except as provided by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1035, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-404. Not to be appointed to office.

During the time for which he has been elected or for one year thereafter, no member of the governing body of any city or town shall be appointed to any municipal office which is created or the emoluments of which are increased during the term for which he has been elected except in the cases provided in this title.

Any member of the governing body of any city or town who has a personal or private interest in any matter proposed or pending before the governing body shall disclose such interest to the governing body, shall not vote thereon, and shall refrain from attempting to influence the decisions of the other members of the governing body in voting on the matter.

A member of the governing body of any city or town may vote notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section if his participation is necessary to obtain a quorum or otherwise enable the body to act and if he complies with the voluntary disclosure provisions of section 24-18-110, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1035, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1127, § 1, effective March 18; entire section amended, p. 907, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-304 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-405. Emoluments not to be increased.

The emoluments of any member of the governing body, including the mayor, trustees, and councilmen, shall not be increased or diminished during the term for which he has been elected or appointed except in the case of abolition of an office, in which case the emoluments of the office shall cease at the time of such abolishment. Any member of the governing body, including the mayor, trustees, and councilmen, who has resigned or vacated an office prior to the end of his elective or appointive term shall not be eligible to reelection or reappointment to the same during such term if during such term the emoluments have been increased.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1035, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-305 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-406. Territorial corporations - compensation fixed by electors.

In cities and towns of not more than five thousand inhabitants incorporated prior to July 3, 1877, the mayor and members of the governing body shall not receive any compensation for services rendered by them as such mayor or members unless the question of paying such mayor or members for their services is first submitted to the registered electors of such city or town and unless a majority of those voting thereon vote in favor thereof. All ordinances, resolutions, and other acts of the governing body of any such city or town authorizing or directing the payment of any compensation to any such officer shall be and remain void. Nothing in this section shall apply to any municipal judge who acts or officiates as president of any governing body.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1036, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 327, § 81, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-306 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-4-407. Penalty for receiving illegal compensation.

Any mayor or member of the governing body of any city or town who takes or receives payment for any services rendered by him contrary to the provisions of section 31-4-406 commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars. Said fines, when collected, shall be paid into the general fund of said city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1036, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-5-307 as it existed prior to 1975.